Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.88.060

Promoting prostitution—Definitions.

The following definitions are applicable in RCW 9A.88.070 through 9A.88.090:

(1) "Advances prostitution." A person "advances prostitution" if, acting other than as a prostitute or as a customer thereof, he or she causes or aids a person to commit or engage in prostitution, procures or solicits customers for prostitution, provides persons or premises for prostitution purposes, operates or assists in the operation of a house of prostitution or a prostitution enterprise, or engages in any other conduct designed to institute, aid, or facilitate an act or enterprise of prostitution.

(2) "Profits from prostitution." A person "profits from prostitution" if, acting other than as a prostitute receiving compensation for personally rendered prostitution services, he or she accepts or receives money or anything of value pursuant to an agreement or understanding with any person whereby he or she participates or is to participate in the proceeds of prostitution activity.

[ 2017 c 231 s 5; 2011 c 336 s 412; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.88.060.]

NOTES:

Finding—2017 c 231: See note following RCW 9A.04.080.